Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 8. Participation by Political Subdivisions and Public Organizations.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Secs. 39.35.550 — 39.35.590.
Request by political subdivision to participate and adoption of resolution; request by public organization to participate and adoption of resolution; survey to determine estimated cost; effective date of participation; designation of eligible employees and agreement to contribute. [Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 39.35.600.
Eligible employees bound to plan.

The eligible employees of a participating political subdivision or public organization are bound by the provisions of this plan and are entitled to the benefits provided under it.

History.

(§ 44 e ch 143 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.605.
Contractors and employees of contractors excluded from plan.

A person or legal entity providing services to the state or to a political subdivision or public organization on a contractual or fee basis may not participate as an employer in the plan based on those services.

A person may not participate in the plan as an employee or member as the result of performing work for a person providing services under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 29 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For provision providing for the severability of this section from the remainder of ch. 29, SLA 2016, see sec. 9, ch. 29, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 29, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on September 20, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 8, ch. 29, SLA 2016, this section applies "to contracts entered into on or after September 20, 2016."

Sec. 39.35.610.
Transmittal of contributions to administrator; claims against funds of an employer.

The contributions of an employer and the contributions of its employees shall be transmitted to the administrator as soon as practicable after the close of the payroll period for which the contributions are made. Subject to (c) of this section, if an employer is delinquent in transferring the contributions for more than 15 days, interest shall be assessed on the outstanding contributions at one and one-half times the most recent actuarially determined rate of earnings for the retirement plan from the date that the contributions were originally due.

If contributions are not submitted within the prescribed time limit, the amount of contributions and interest due may be claimed by the administrator from any agency of the state or political subdivision that has in its possession funds of the employer or that is authorized to disburse funds to the employer that are not restricted by statute or appropriation to a specific purpose. The amount claimed shall be certified by the administrator as sufficient to pay the contributions and interest due from the employer. The agency shall submit the amount claimed, or the amount of funds of the employer subject to the administrator’s claim that are in the agency’s possession, whichever is less, to the administrator for deposit in the retirement fund and the Alaska retiree health care trust.

If an employer delinquent in transferring a contribution is a municipality in which the population decreased by more than 25 percent between 2000 and 2010, according to the decennial census conducted by the United States Bureau of the Census, the administrator may assess interest on the outstanding contribution at a rate less than the rate required in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 44 f ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 28 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 53 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 72 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 15 ch 13 SLA 2008; am §§ 3, 4 ch 49 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (a), added “Subject to (c) of this section, if” at the beginning of the second sentence; added (c).

Sec. 39.35.615.
Effect of termination by amendment of agreement.

A political subdivision or public organization may request that its participation agreement be amended. The request may be made only after adoption of a resolution by the legislative body of the political subdivision and approval of the resolution by the person required by law to approve the resolution, or, in the case of a public organization, after adoption of a resolution by the governing body of that public organization. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the administrator. An employer may not award past service to employees added to its participation agreement. When an employer requests to amend its participation agreement to add an elected official, the plan may cover that elected official only if the employer pays compensation to the elected official, for services as an elected official, in the amount of at least $2,001 a month. If a political subdivision or public organization amends its participation agreement so as to terminate coverage of a department, group, or other classification of employees, each employee whose coverage is so terminated, regardless of the employee’s employment status at the date of termination, shall be considered fully vested in actuarially adjusted accrued retirement benefits as of the date of termination, unless

the employee’s contributions have been refunded; or

the political subdivision or public organization amended its participation agreement to exclude coverage for the affected department, group, or other classification of employees at the written request of a majority of the employees employed in that department, group, or other classification at the time the request was made.

Each employee whose coverage is terminated must, within 60 days after the date of termination, inform the administrator, in writing, whether the employee wishes to obtain a refund or a vested benefit.

Each employee who elects to obtain a refund shall receive a refund of the balance of the employee contribution account. The vesting in accrued benefits for each employee who elects to obtain a refund is voided upon receipt of the refund, and the corresponding credited service may not be reinstated under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

. A partial refund may not be allowed under this section.

[Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

[Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

[Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

[Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

[Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

Termination of coverage of a department, group, or other classification of employees does not bar future coverage of that department, group, or classification if the employer is current with payments on amounts due under AS

39.35.625

. If coverage of a department, group, or classification is terminated under (a) of this section and the employer later amends its participation agreement to provide renewed coverage of that department, group, or classification, an affected employee may be credited only with future service.

History.

(§ 44 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 65, 66 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 50 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 73, 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007; am §§ 16, 17, 24 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.620.
Termination of participation.

If the contributions are not transmitted to the commissioner of administration within the prescribed time limit, the commissioner may grant an extension. If the political subdivision or public organization is in default at the end of the extension, participation in the plan is terminated, and it shall be sent notice of termination.

All employees of the terminating employer whose contributions have not been refunded, regardless of their employment status at the date of termination, shall be considered fully vested in their adjusted accrued retirement benefits as of the date of termination of the employer.

[Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

Each employee of a terminating employer must, within 60 days of the employer’s termination of participation, inform the administrator, in writing, whether the employee wishes to obtain a refund or a vested benefit.

Each employee who elects to obtain a refund shall receive a refund of the balance, determined as of the date of the employer’s termination of participation, of the employee contribution account. The vesting in accrued benefits for each employee who elects to receive a refund is voided upon receipt of the refund and corresponding credited service may not be reinstated under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

. A partial refund may not be allowed under this section.

[Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

[Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

[Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

[Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

[Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

Termination of an employer’s participation in the plan does not bar future participation in the system by that employer if the employer is current with payments on amounts due under AS

39.35.625

. If a previously terminated employer returns to the system, the employer may only participate in the plan established under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

. Employees may be credited under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

only with service subsequent to the date of return.

History.

(§ 44 g ch 143 SLA 1960; am §§ 29 — 35 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 109 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 45 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 67 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 74, 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007; am §§ 18, 24 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

The intent of the amendment made by § 109, ch. 127, SLA 1974, was to bring the former language of AS

39.35.620(b)

into conformity with art. I, § 3 of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.
As the reenactment of that subsection by § 29, ch. 1, SLA 1974 removed the necessity for the change in ch. 127, the reenacted version contained in ch. 1, SLA 1974 prevails.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.625.
Termination costs.

Notwithstanding AS

39.35.255

, an employer that terminates participation of a department, group, or other classification of employees in the plan under AS

39.35.615

or that terminates participation in the plan under AS

39.35.620

shall pay to the plan each payroll period until the past service liability of the plan is extinguished an amount calculated by applying the current past service contribution rate adopted by the board to the greater of total base salaries paid

during the payroll period to employees in positions for which coverage has been terminated;

at the time of termination to employees in positions for which coverage has been terminated; or

during the corresponding payroll period for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, to employees in positions for which coverage has been terminated.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the administrator may enter into a payment plan acceptable to the administrator for payment of an employer’s liability for termination costs. Termination costs not paid as prescribed by (a) of this section or in accordance with an approved payment plan may be collected by the administrator in accordance with AS

39.35.610(b)

.

An employer requesting termination of all participation in the plan, termination of participation in the plan of a department, group, or other classification of employees, or a payment plan for payment of termination costs shall pay the cost associated with obtaining a termination cost study associated with the employer’s termination.

History.

(§ 19 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Sec. 39.35.630.
Distribution.

A distribution made as a result of termination of participation by an employer may, to the extent that no discrimination in value results, be paid in cash or in annuity contracts, in the discretion of the board.

History.

(§ 44 h ch 143 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.35.640.
Conclusiveness of action taken upon termination.

In making a distribution, the determinations, divisions, appraisals, apportionments, and allotments made are final and conclusive and not subject to question.

History.

(§ 44 i ch 143 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.35.650.
Refunds to employers.

An employer may not receive an amount from the plan, except as provided under AS

39.35.115(e)

.

History.

(§ 44 i ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 46 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 32 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 75 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 20 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.